<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881129-0036 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-29-88.f2.A1035</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1915</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-046]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Fall Protection for Shipyard Employment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)proposes to revise the shipyard employment safety standards addressingfall protection. The standards proposed for revision regulate the design,construction, and use of fall protection in shipyards.The existing shipyard employment standards (29 CFR Part 1915) apply toshipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking operations and related employments.However, the present standards in Part 1915 are not comprehensive in theircoverage of shipyard hazards, and are supplemented by the general industrystandards (29 CFR Part 1910) as necessary to provide complete coveragefor all the hazards encountered in shipyards. This document is one of aseries of proposals which are intended to revise Part 1915 to provide comprehensivecoverage of shipyard employment solely within that part.   This action will consolidate and update the shipyard employment fall protectionstandards and the appropriate general industry fall protection standardsinto a single, comprehensive Part 1915 that would apply to all activitiesand areas in shipyards (except construction activities covered by Part1926). The proposed provisions will delete many existing specificationprovisions which currently limit employer innovation, and where appropriate,use performance-oriented provisions to address the hazards of falling andof being struck by falling objects.   The specific topic of fall protection is currently addressed in SubpartE of the current Shipyard Employment Standards, along with the topics ofscaffolds, laddders, and other walking/working surface considerations.To format the rules into a more logical grouping of topics, this and relatedactions would retain coverage of ladders and other access and egress concernsin Subpart E, and would relocate fall protection and scaffolds from thecurrent Subpart E to a new Subpart M_Fall Protection, and a new SubpartN_Scaffolds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments on this proposed rulemaking must be postmarkedby February 27, 1989. Hearing requests must be postmarked by February 27,1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments and requests for a hearing should besent in quadruplicate to the Docket Office, Docket No. S-046, U.S. Departmentof Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Room N-2634, 200Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Materials in the rulemakingrecord are available for public inspection and copying at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. James Foster, Office of Informationand Consumer Affairs, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, U.S.Department of Labor, Room N-3647, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington,DC 20210, Telephone: (202) 523-8151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The principal author of this noticeof proposed rulemaking is Roy F. Gurnham, Office of Construction and CivilEngineering Safety Standards, Occupational Safety and Health Administration.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background and Approach</ITAG>In May 1971, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration under authoritygranted by section 6(a) of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970(29 U.S.C. 655), adopted established Federal standards issued under section41 of the Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 941),as standards applicable to ship repairing (29 CFR Part 1915), shipbuilding(29 CFR Part 1916), and shipbreaking (29 CFR Part 1917) operations. Inaddition, OSHA adopted other Federal standards and national consensus standardsas general industry standards (29 CFR Part 1910) and construction industrystandards (29 CFR Part 1926) which were made applicable to hazards andworking conditions not specifically covered by Parts 1915, 1916, or 1917.On April 20, 1982, the ship repairing, shipbuilding, and shipbreaking standardswere consolidated into one Part 1915 of Title 29, Code of Federal Regulations,and titled ``Occupational Safety and Health Standards for Shipyard Employment''(47 FR 16984). The consolidation eliminated duplicate provisions and overlappingprovisions, but did not alter substantive requirements. The consolidationdid not affect the applicability of general industry standards in 29 CFRPart 1910 to hazards or conditions in shipyard employments not specificallyaddressed in the consolidated Part 1915 (see 29 CFR 1910.5(c)(2)).In 1982, the Shipbuilders Council of America and the American WaterwaysShipyard Conference requested OSHA to identify the specific applicableprovisions of the general industry standards which apply to shipyards,and consolidate them with the existing Part 1915 provisions into a singleset of shipyard employment standards. OSHA has determined that such consolidationis appropriate. This and other proposed rulemakings will eventually incorporateall applicable Part 1910 provisions into the existing organization of Part1915. The present Part 1915 organizational format, which is already familiarto present users of the shipyard standards, provides a logical groupingof related provisions based on the type of work activity, hazard, or equipmentinvolved. However, when a regrouping of topics would facilitate understandingof the rules, or when applicable Part 1910 provisions have no counterpartin the existing Part 1915 structure, the proposal would create new subpartsor subpart hearings in Part 1915.In addition to consolidating the provisions of Part 1910 and Part 1915,OSHA proposes to revise the consolidated provisions as appropriate. OSHAhas not substantively revised many of the current provisions in these partssince they were promulgated in 1971. OSHA believes some provisions needto be revised to reflect technological advances. Other provisions needto be revised because they are based on national consensus standards issuedprior to 1971, and do not reflect the revisions made since that time. Asthe provisions are consolidated, all such revised consensus standards willbe reviewed, and OSHA's provisions revised as necessary to effectuate thepurposes of the standard and the OSH Act. Where practical, all currentincorporations by reference of national consensus standards and other materialswill be deleted by the proposed standards, and the text of all such requirementswill be proposed for inclusion in the body of the proposed standards, ortheir appendices. This approach is intended to assist employers in determiningwhat duties and obligations are imposed by a provision by minimizing theneed to refer to documents outside Part 1915. OSHA will also use the consolidationproject to replace specification requirements with performance-orientedrequirements where it is known that there is more than one way to providesafety equivalent to that provided by the present specification requirements.Specification requirements would be used only where necessary to set appropriatelimits and to clarify duties and obligations.The revision of the shipyard employment standards will be coordinated withefforts to revise parallel provisions in the construction and general industrystandards so that consistent coverage of hazards which are encounteredin these industry sectors can be provided.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary and Explanation of the Proposal</ITAG>The need to have fall protection is currently covered primarily by 29 CFRPart 1915, Subpart E_Scaffolds, Ladders, and Other Working Surfaces, and29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart D_Walking-Working Surfaces. Consolidation ofthese two sub-parts into one subpart would result in a large, cumbersomesubpart, because of the wide range of topics covered. Therefore, OSHA isproposing to divide the consolidated Part 1915 standards into three subparts.The proposed subparts would be Subpart E_Access and Egress; Subpart M_FallProtection; and Subpart N_Scaffolds. This reformatting, in and of itself,would neither create nor delete any requirements. These subparts wouldset forth the requirements to have fall protection, and would set forththe criteria for many of the systems to be used for fall protection. Otherfall protection systems, such as body belts, body harnesses, and positioningdevices would be covered by proposed Subpart I_Personal Protective Equipmentfor Shipyard Employment.In accordance with paragraph 6(b)(8) of the Occupational Safety and HealthAct of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 655), the agency has reviewed the various nationalconsensus standards that cover working conditions dealt with in this proposal.Where appropriate, OSHA has incorporated provisions from those nationalconsensus standards as part of this proposal. OSHA believes that the proposedstandard will better effectuate the purposes of the Safety and Health Actof 1970 than the national consensus standards which have not been madea part of this proposal, because this proposal is more comprehensive andprovides greater flexibility in its requires for safety.The following discussion provides a more detailed explanation of the proposedprovisions related to fall protection.Section 1915.201 Scope, application, and definitions applicable to thissubpart.<T3>Paragraph 1915.201(a)_Scope and application. </T3>This paragraph outlinesthe scope and application of the entire Subpart M. The proposal appliesto all workplaces and operations found in shipyards, including those aboardvessels and sub-assemblies of vessels, except for the following areas:Fall protection for employees involved in the construction, alteration,repair (including painting and decorating) and demolition of shore facilitieswould continue to be addressed by 29 CFR Part 1926_Construction IndustryStandards, which are not affected by this proposal; fall protection foremployees on stairways and ladders would be as provided in proposed SubpartE_Access and Egress; and fall protection for employees on scaffolds wouldbe as provided in proposed Subpart N_Scaffolds.This proposal incorporates all applicable provisions of 29 CFR Part 1910,Subpart D, related to fall protection, and that subpart no longer appliesto fall protection considerations in shipyard workplaces and operations.Certain of the proposed provisions contain ``grandfather'' provisions.These provisions allow employers to continue using facilities and equipmentwhich do not meet the proposed requirements, but which do meet the regulationspresently in effect. Thus, facilities which are currently meeting the specifiedOSHA criteria would not have to be replaced or altered to meet the newcriteria. However, all new facilities and equipment built or installedafter the effective date of this subpart would have to meet the proposedcriteria. For example, proposed paragraph andSection; 1915.202(c)(5) requiresguardrail systems to be installed at all wall openings which have a bottomedge less than 39 inches above the surface upon which the employee is working.The existing provision, andSection; 1910.23(b)(3), requires guardrail systemsonly when the bottom edge is less than 36 inches high. Under the proposedrules, the employer would not have to install a guardrail system on wallopenings which meet the existing 36 inch rule. However, all wall openingscreated or installed in a wall (such as by altering or constructing a building)after the effective date of this standard, would come under the 39 inchrule. In the proposed rules, all ``grandfathering'' provisions are indicatedin brackets ([ ]) immediately following the new criteria. If a requirementdoes not contain a bracketed provision, then no ``grandfathering'' exceptionis made. In the specific issues section of this preamble, OSHA requestscomments as to whether the provisions proposed for ``grandfathering'' shouldindeed be ``grandfathered,'' and whether or not other provisions shouldbe ``grandfathered.''<T3>Paragraph 1915.201(b)_Definitions applicable to this subpart</T3>.This paragraph lists and defines all major words used in the proposed standard.Many of the definitions are the same as those in the existing standard,however some have been reworded for uniformity or clarity. The followingwords have been added or have been changed from the existing definitions:``Dangerous equipment.'' This term is used to refer to equipment such asgalvanizing tanks, machinery, electrical equipment and similar hazards,which are hazards because of their form or function.``Equivalent.'' This term is used in the proposal to allow alternativemeans of complying with the standards. The definition makes clear thatwhere the standard allows the use of ``equivalent'' means, the employermust demonstrate that all such alternative means of compliance will providean equal or greater degree of safety than that attained by using the methodor item specified in the standard.``Failure.'' This word is used in performance-oriented paragraphs suchas (a)(3), (a)(5), (b)(4), (c)(2), and (d)(2) of andSection; 1915.203 whichaddress guardrail, safety net, cover, and toeboard strength. The definitionmakes it clear that, along with breakage and separation of component parts,load refusal (the point where the ultimate strength of a component is exceeded)is also considered to be failure. This is the point where structural memberslose their ability to carry loads.``Guardrail system.'' This term, which defines guardrails as vertical barrierserected to prevent employees from falling, replaces the existing term,``standard railing'' currently used in Subpart D.``Lower levels.'' This term is used to describe the areas to which an employeecould fall. The definition does not apply to the surface on which the employeeis performing work duties.``Personal fall arrest system.'' This term replaces the existing term ``safetybelt'' to reflect current industry use of the new term, and to clarifythat, in addition to belts, there are a variety of components that makeup a complete fall protection system. ``Positioning device system.'' This new term identifies a piece of equipmentwhich allows an employee to work with both hands free while the employeeis leaning backwards.``Qualified person.'' This term is used to describe the training and experiencenecessary for individuals responsible for performing certain specifiedtasks such as safety net inspection.``Toeboard.'' This term is used to describe one type of falling objectprotection, and clarifies that such barriers are not installed to preventan employee from stepping off an otherwise unprotected side or edge.``U-guard.'' This is a term used to describe a type of guardrail systemused aboard vessels to prevent employees from falling into manholes orother small deck openings. Currently, there is no consensus name for thissystem. They are known by various names including ``hairpins,'' ``fieldgoals,''and ``horseshoes.''``Unprotected sides and edges.'' This term replaces the term ``unguardededges'' which is not defined in existing Subpart E of Part 1915, and replaces``open-sided floors, platforms, and runways'' which is not defined in existingSubpart D of Part 1910.``Vessel section.'' This term is used to clarify the areas where certainrules apply. It means all subassemblies, modules, and other componentsof a vessel which are not directly attached to the vessel because of thestate of construction, repair, or breaking.``Walking/working surface.'' This term is used as a generic term for allthe types of surfaces on which employees must be in order to perform theirjob duties.Section 1915.202 Requirements to have fall protection.This section specifies the places and areas where fall protection systemswould be required. The specifics of the fall protection systems are addressedin andSection; 1915.203, fall protection systems criteria and practices.An employer would refer to andSection; 1915.202 to see where fall protectionis required, and would refer to andSection; 1915.203 to see how to providethe required protection. This format allows consolidation of the varioussystems criteria, and eliminates redundant criteria provisions such asthe guardrail height limits currently specified in existing andSection;andSection;1915.74(a)(2),(a)(7), (a)(9), (b), and (c)(2).<T3>Paragraph 1915.202(a)_General. </T3>Paragraph (a)(1) of andSection;1915.202requires all fall protection to be installed and in use before employeesbegin any other work activity in the area of the fall hazard. Althoughnot specifically stated in the existing provisions, this requirement isnot considered by OSHA to be a new requirement.Paragraph (a)(2) of andSection;1915.202 would limit the application of thesubpart by identifying specific areas where fall protection systems wouldnot be required due to the nature of the activity that takes place in thoseareas. Generally, these areas are loading or access areas where the provisionsof existing Subpart D, literally interpreted, could apply, but where OSHAbelieves fall protection systems such as guardrails or body belts wouldunacceptably interfere with the work to be performed. Specifically, theseareas are the top water-side edges of wharves, piers, and quays; the loadingsides of loading docks, and ladders, vehicles, trailers, and assembly tables.Whether or not this list is too broad, and whether or not other areas oractivities should be added to this list, are points raised in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble.<T3>Paragraph 1915.202(b)_Fall protection on vessels, vessel sections,and vessel means of access. </T3>This paragraph sets forth the requirementsto have fall protection for employees aboard vessels, vessel sections,and vessel means of access. The following table lists the proposed provisionsof paragraph (b) of andSection;1915.202 which would not be substantivelychanged from their corresponding counterparts contained in the existingparagraphs listed.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,xl10</C> <H1>Proposed paragraph</H1><H1>Existing paragraph</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (2)<D>andSection;1915.73(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (3)<D>andSection;1915.73(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (5)<D>andSection;1915.77(e)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (7)<D>andSection;1915.73(g)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (8)<D>andSection;1915.77(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (9)<D>andSection;1915.75(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection;1915.202(b) (11)<D>andSection;1915.74(a) (2)</D></ITAG></ITAG>Paragraph (b)(1) of andSection;1915.202 requires covers or guardrails tobe used to protect employees working near small openings in the walking/workingsurfaces aboard vessels. This is the same requirement as andSection;1915.73(b),except that U-guards would be recognized as an acceptable alternative systemfor fall protection. These systems, variously known as ``hairpins,'' ``fieldgoals,''``horseshoes,'' and other colloquialisms, are currently used in many shipyards.However, a uniform set of criteria for U-guards (i.e., height limits, strength,etc.), has not yet been developed. The need for such criteria, along withsome criteria which have been suggested to OSHA, is discussed in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble. Another change is the deletion of thewords ``or the physical conditions'' from the phrase which qualifies whenguardrail systems must be used or installed. These words are not necessaryas the ``impossibility'' of a requirement is always to be considered.Paragraph (b)(4) of andSection; 1915.202 requires personal flotation devicesto be used to protect employees on vessels afloat working near unprotectedsides and edges which are over water. This is the same requirement as andSection;1915.73(e),except ``platforms, flats, and similar surfaces above water on vesselsafloat'' has been added to make the provision compatible with proposedandSection;1915.202(b)(3) which addresses fall protection above solid surfaces.Paragraph (b)(6) of andSection;1915.202 guardrails or planks to be used toprotect against falling into bilges where floor plates or gratings havebeen removed. This is the same requirement as andSection;1915.73(f), exceptthe requirement for 10-inch planking is clarified by adding a thicknessdimension of two inches. Two-inch planking is the standard size used onsimilar surfaces such as scaffold platforms (see andSection;1915.71(i)(1)).Paragraph (b)(10) of andSection;1915.202 would require employees to be protectedagainst falling into the water when they are on the deck of a floatingdrydock. This is essentially the same rule as existing andSection;1915.75(e),except that the existing rule only requires employees to be provided withfall protection equipment, whereas the proposal requires that such equipmentbe both provided and used.<T3>Paragraph 1915.202(c)_Fall protection ashore. </T3>The paragraph setsforth the requirements to have fall protection for employees ashore, andaddresses all areas in a shipyard covered by the subpart which are noton a vessel, vessel section, or vessel means of access. Such areas include,but are not limited to, office buildings, shops, foundries, assembly buildings,storage tanks, warehouses, elevated walkways (catwalks), retaining walls,derricks, cranes and gantries. These areas are presently covered by theprovisions of Part 1910, Subpart D_Walking/Working Surfaces, which requirefall protection to be provided wherever a fall hazard of four feet or moreexists. However, existing specific provisions andSection;1915.71(j), andSection;1915.71(k),andSection;1915.73(d), and andSection;1915.77(c) require fall protection onlywhere the fall hazard is five feet or more. Some yards have concluded thatthe five foot limit applies to all areas in a shipyard. To eliminate thisconflict and resulting confusion, paragraph (c) of andSection;1915.202 clearlysets forth that the four foot rule of the existing general industry standardsapplies to all areas in shipyards, with certain specific exceptions madein the scope and some other areas which are discussed below. However, publiccomment is requested on this point in the Specific Issues section of thispreamble.Paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.202 specifies that guardrail systemsshall be used to provide fall protection for employees on floors, roofs,ramps, walkways, graving dock edges, and other walking/working surfaces.However, when this is impracticable, then personal fall arrest systems,positioning device systems, or safety nets shall be used. This is essentiallythe same requirements as in existing Part 1910 Subpart D, and Part 1915Subpart E, except that the proposed rules would add safety nets as an acceptablealternative under certain conditions, and that guardrail systems are listedin the proposed rules as the preferred method of protection when theiruse is practicable. Guardrail systems are preferred because they serveto restrain employees from falling off a work level, whereas personal fallarrest systems and safety nets function only after a fall has taken place,and positioning device systems offer no protection when a worker changeslocations. Whether or not it is practicable to install a guardrail systemdepend on the specifics of the area where protection is required. For example,guardrail systems are not practicable if their installation requires greateremployee exposure to the fall hazard than would be experienced by employeesworking in the area without guardrail system protection. In order to furtherdevelop this point, public comment is requested on this issue in the SpecificIssues section of this preamble.Paragraph (c)(2) of andSection; 1915.202 requires employees to be protectedby personal fall arrest systems when they are in an area provided withguardrail systems, but in which the guardrails, or portions thereof, havebeen removed to allow passage of materials, tools, or equipment. This situationusually is most hazardous when the employees are leaning out through theopening while trying to guide the incoming materials, or when they aretrying to signal someone on another level.Paragraph (c)(3) of andSection; 1915.202 requires employees to be protectedby guardrail systems or equipment guards when the employees are less thanfour feet above dangerous equipment. This rule is essentially the sameprovision as in andSection; 1910.23 (c)(3), and addresses the nature of theimpact surface which could cause a serious injury. Personal fall arrestsystems and nets would not be allowed for this kind of protection at heightsless than four feet above the dangerous equipment, because such systemsare usually not rigged in such a way as to prevent employee contact withthe dangerous equipment.Paragraph (c)(4) of andSection; 1915.202 requires employees to be protectedby guardrail systems, personal fall arrest systems, or safety net systemswhen the employees are four feet or more above dangerous equipment.Whereas paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.202 addresses perimeter or unprotectedsides and edges of walking/working surfaces ashore, paragraph (c)(5) ofandSection; 1915.202 addresses holes in such surfaces (the term ``opening''is used for spaces in walls). The provision requires that all holes intowhich employees can accidentally walk be protected by guardrail systems,covers, or an attendant. This is essentially the same requirement as containedin paragraphs (a)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) of andSection; 1910.23.However, whether or not an attendant is an appropriate method of protection,and, if so, what conditions or limitations should be imposed on its use,are points raised in the Specific Issues section of this preamble.Paragraph (c)(6) of andSection; 1915.202 requires tanks, vats, and similarenclosures to be provided with guardrail systems or covers. This is essentiallythe same provision as andSection; 1910.22(c).Paragraph (c)(7) of andSection; 1915.202 requires certain specified wallopenings to be provided with fall protection. This provision is based onthe requirement, andSection; 1910.23(b), except the minimum distance fromthe walking/working surface to the bottom edge of the wall opening is changedfrom 36 inches to 39 inches, consistent with the proposed minimum fallprotection criteria proposed for all other locations. However, the existing36-inch limit is ``grandfathered'' so that all facilities constructed priorto the effective date of this standard will not have to be changed.<T3>Paragraph 1915.202(d)_Protection from falling objects. </T3>This paragraphsets forth when protection from falling objects must be provided and isessentially the same as andSection; 1910.23(c)(1)(i), except screens, guardrailsystems, or protective canopies may be used in lieu of toeboards. The proposalrequires such protection only as necessary when employees are on or immediatelyadjacent to vessels or vessel sections.Section 1915.203 Fall protection systems criteria and practices.This section sets forth the requirements for each type of fall protectionsystem and its use. Whereas andSection; 1915.202 tells the employer wherefall protection is required and the types of systems which are to be usedto provide that protection, andSection; 1915.203 states the proper mannerto install and use each system. In other words, andSection; 1915.202 is the``where, what and when'' provision, and andSection; 1915.203 is the ``how''provision.<T3>Paragraph 1915.203(a)_Guardrail systems. </T3>This paragraph sets forththe criteria for constructing and using guardrail systems (both fixed andportable) installed to meet the requirements of andSection; 1915.202. Paragraph(a)(1) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies the limits for the top edge heightsof various guardrail systems.Paragraph (a)(1) (i) and (ii) of andSection; 1915.203 set forth the heightcriteria for specified guardrail systems aboard vessels, vessel sections,and vessel means of access. These are essentially the same provisions ascontained in paragraphs andSection; 1915.73 (c) and (d), except the words``vessel sections'' have been added. In the Specific Issues section ofthis preamble, public comment is requested on whether or not these twoprovisions should be changed to conform to the general height requirementof 39 to 45 inches proposed for all other guardrail systems.Paragraph (a)(1)(i) of andSection; 1915.203 sets the height requirementsfor all guardrail systems used throughout shipyards, except those on vessels,vessel sections, and vessel means of access covered by paragraphs (a)(1)(ii)and (iii) of andSection; 1915.203. This paragraph consolidates the followingeight existing requirements:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,xl10,xl10</C> <H1>Existing paragraph number</H1><H1>Existing provision</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1910.23(e)(1) <D/>&quot;42 inches nominal&quot;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.73(d) <D/>&quot;42 to 45 inches&quot;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.73(g) <D/>&quot;adequate&quot;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.75 (b), (c), (d) <D/>&quot;approximately 42 inches&quot;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.75(e) <D/>&quot;42 inch&quot;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1915.75(g) <D/>&quot;42 to 45 inches&quot;</ITAG></ITAG>OSHA currently interprets the words ``nominal,'' ``adequate,'' and ``approximately''to mean a range of 39 to 45 inches. The proposal formally adopts this rangefor guardrail systems in general. However, many shore facilities were constructedprior to OSHA's inception, and were built to comply with building codesand other guidelines which require[d] guardrails to be only 36 inches high.These existing systems would be ``grandfathered'' by the proposal. However,as existing systems are replaced they would have to meet the new minimumlimit. Existing guardrails which are repaired need only meet the 36-inchlimit. Public comment is requested on these points in the Specific Issuessection of this preamble.Paragraph (a)(2) of andSection; 1915.203 requires midrails, screens, mesh,intermediate vertical members (i.e., balusters), or equivalent structuralmembers to be installed between the top edge of the system and the walking/workingsurface where there is no wall or parapet wall at least 21 inches high(the same height as a typical midrail on a 42-inch high guardrail system).This is essentially the same requirement as andSection;andSection; 1910.23(e)(3)(v)(<T3>c</T3>) and 1915.71(j)(1). Paragraph (a)(2)(i) specifies midrail heightand is the same requirement as in andSection;andSection; 1910.23(e)(1) and1915.71(j)(1). Paragraphs (a)(2) (ii), (iii), and (iv) are new alternativeprovisions that allow for the use of screens, mesh, intermediate verticalmembers, and other structural members in lieu of midrails, and addresstheir proper placement. Although these are new provisions, OSHA believesthey lessen the existing burden of compliance by expanding the range ofoptions available to the employer.Paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 1915.203 requires guardrail systems to becapable of withstanding the application of a 200 pound force applied withintwo inches of the top edge in an outward or downward direction. This isthe same requirement as andSection; 1910.23(e)(3)(v)(<T3>b</T3>) and is equivalent to andSection; 1915.71(j)(2) which specifies2 andmultiply; 4 inch lumber at eight foot distances between uprights.Paragraph (a)(4) of andSection; 1915.203 clarifies that paragraphs (a) (1)and (3) of andSection; 1915.203 are interdependent provisions. When the loadis applied to the toprail or edge, it must not deflect below the systemheight set forth in paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 1915.203. Deflectionis specified for the top edge because that is the point an employee ismost likely to fall against, and it must remain high enough, at all times,to prevent the employee from flipping over the top of the system.Paragraph (a)(5) of andSection; 1915.203 provides specifications for midrails,screens, mesh, intermediate vertical members, and equivalent structuralmembers. Currently, there is no requirement that sets forth a minimum strengthcapacity for midrail type protection. The proposed 150 pound capacity requirementis based on the existing construction safety standard for guardrails, whichallows the use of 1 andmultiply; 6-inch lumber as midrails. The breakingstrength of such lumber is approximately 160 pounds, depending on typeand grade of wood used. The 150 pound limit is also being evaluated forinclusion in the proposed standards being developed for the constructionand general industry standards for guardrail systems. The proposal herewill promote consistency between all three sets of guardrail system standards.No mimimum deflection is specified as midrails, screens, mesh, and intermediatevertical members are not the points where an employee is in danger of flippingover the protective barrier.Paragraph (a)(6) of andSection; 1915.203 requires that guardrail systemsbe smooth surfaced to prevent employee injury due to lacerations or trippingcaused by snagged clothing, and is essentially the same requirement asandSection; 1910.23(e)(1).Paragraph (a)(7) of andSection;1915.203 requires that toprails and midrailsnot be so long as to constitute a projection hazard, and is the same requirementas andSection;1910.23(e)(1).Paragraph (a)(8) of andSection;1915.203 is a new requirement and prohibitsthe use of steel banding and plastic banding as toprails or midrails. Whilesuch banding can often withstand a 200 pound load, it can tear easily iftwisted. In addition, such banding often has sharp edges which can cuta hand when grabbed.Paragraph (a)(9) of andSection;1915.203 requires all rails to be at leastone-quarter inch in diameter or thickness. This is consistent with previousOSHA interpretations related to the use of wire cable as toprails and midrails.As guardrail strength is specified in paragraphs (a) (3), (4), and (5)of andSection;1915.203, the purpose of this requirement is to assure thatrails made of high strength materials not be so thin that an employee grabbinga rail is injured because of the small size of the rail.Paragraph (a)(10) of andSection;1915.203 prohibits the use of manila or syntheticfiber rope rails when hot work is being performed or corrosive chemicalsare being used near the rails. This is essentially the same provision asthe requirement contained in andSection;1915.71(j)(2). It is a new requirementfor facilities ashore, but the hazard is the same as on vessels.Paragraph (a)(11) of andSection;1915.203 requires chains, gates, or guardrailsections to be placed across material, tool, and equipment access openingswhen handling operations are not taking place. This provision clarifiesthat such openings in guardrail systems are to be treated as unprotectedsides and edges except when the opening is in use. The rule is based onsimilar provisions in andSection;1910.23(c).Paragraph (a)(12) of andSection;1915.203 provides that when guardrail systemsare used at holes in walking/working surfaces, they be erected on all unprotectedsides or edges of the holes. This is essentially the same requirement asin andSection;1910.23(a).Paragraph (a)(13) of andSection;1915.203 provides that guardrail systemsaround holes used for material access not have more than two sides providedwith removable guardrail sections. This is essentially the same provisionas andSection;1910.23(a)(3)(ii).Paragraph (a)(14) of andSection;1915.203 provides that guardrail systemsaround holes used as points of access (such as ladderways) shall be providedwith gates or be so offset that a person cannot walk directly into thehole. This is essentially the same requirement as andSection;1910.23(a)(2).Paragraph (a)(15) of andSection;1915.203 sets forth the requirements forguardrail systems on ramps and runways and is essentially the same provisionas andSection;1910.23(c)(2).The provisions in existing andSection;1910.23(e)(3) and andSection;1915.71(j)(2)provide detailed specifications for minimum sizes of guardrail system components.The proposal would relocate the specific provisions of these existing paragraphsto Appendix A, and would make them non-mandatory. The current <T3>specifications by themselves do not assure that a guardrail </T3>systemmeets the current performance criteria in andSection;1910.23(e)(3) as theygive no guidance on joints, base connections, and other elements that needto be considered when providing an adequate system. However, by movingthem to a non-mandatory appendix, they can serve as a starting point fordesigning guardrail systems. As the guidelines do not provide all the informationnecessary to build a complete system, the employer is still responsiblefor designing and assembling the components in such a way that the completedsystem will meet the requirements of andSection;1915.203(a) (3), (4), and(5). By placing the existing specification criteria into a non-mandatoryappendix, design flexibility is allowed to employers who desire to engineertheir own guardrail designs, while also providing a partial solution foremployers who either do not desire to or cannot engineer the guardrailsthat are to be used. OSHA believes that the important consideration inguardrail system design and construction is that the system be capableof supporting safely the loads as specified in paragraphs (a) (3), (4)and (5) of andSection;1915.203, and not that a guardrail system have a particularsized component or post spacing.The relocation of the current specifications to Appendix A does not reducethe level of safety presently achieved by the existing standard. The performancecriteria in the proposal are essentially the same as those currently foundin andSection; 1910.23(e)(3)(v). The specifications being moved to AppendixA provide, at best, a partial solution to the design of an adequate system,and they do not allow the necessary flexibility for development of systemswhich meet the performance criteria in the standard. Accordingly, relocatingthe specifications to Appendix A reduces the number of redundant provisionsin the standard and eliminates the possible misinterpretation that thespecified components and constructions are the only ones acceptable forbuilding guardrail systems. <T3>Paragraph 1915.203(b)_Safety net systems. </T3>This paragraph setsforth the criteria for safety net systems installed to meet the requirementsof andSection; 1915.202. Currently, there are no similar provisions in eitherSubpart D of Part 1910 or Subpart E of Part 1915. The proposed provisionsare, therefore, based on the existing and proposed provisions for safetynets contained in 29 CFR Part 1926, Occupational Safety and Health Standardsfor the construction industry. These provisions are presently in andSection;1926.105, and a modified version of these standards is contained in andSection;1926.502(c) of OSHA's proposed revision to the fall protection standardsfor construction (51 FR 42718) published on November 25, 1986. These provisionsdo not impose new burdens on the employer, but allow the use of safetynets as an option for meeting the general fall protection requirementsof andSection; 1915.202. This option is not given under the existing shipyardand general industry rules. Paragraph (b)(1) of andSection; 1915.203 requires nets to extend outwardat least 15 feet from the outermost projection of the work surface. Thisis a change from the existing eight foot requirement of andSection; 1926.105(c)(1).The National Bureau of Standards (NBS) has conducted tests to evaluatethis requirement. Their findings indicate that at least 15 feet are requiredto fully contain a body falling 25 feet (Ref. 3:50). Paragraph (b)(2) of andSection; 1915.203 requires safety nets to be installedas close as practicable under the walking/working surface where employeesneed to be protected, but in no case more than 25 feet below such level.Paragraph (b)(3) of andSection; 1915.203 requires nets to be rigged withsufficient clearance under them to prevent contact with the lower levelwhen the net is subjected to impact forces as specified in paragraph (b)(4)of andSection; 1915.203. Paragraph (b)(4) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies the capacity requirementsfor safety nets and safety net installations. The paragraph requires employersto show that nets and net installation meet the capacity requirements byconducting drop tests meeting designated parameters, or by certificationby a qualified person that the net and net installations meet all specifiedcriteria when the employer can demonstrate that drop testing is not practicable.An example of where a drop test may not be practicable is where the netis strung over a public thoroughfare and the test could endanger peoplebelow. Another example is where the test weight cannot be readily retrievedfrom the net once it has been dropped. For the purposes of paragraph (b)(4), OSHA considers two or more net panelsjoined together to be one net. Safety net installations which do not sharethe same net are considered to be separate systems. In addition, each timea safety net system is erected, it is considered to be a separate installationwhich must be tested or certified. Paragraph (b)(4)(i) of andSection; 1915.203 sets forth the proposed criteriafor performing drop tests on net installations. In most respects, thesecriteria are the same as the paragraph 8 requirements of ANSI A10.11-1979(Ref. 1). However, the proposal requires the test to be conducted fromthe highest level walking/working surface on which employees are to beprotected, as opposed to the 25 foot height required by ANSI, so that thetest more closely resembles the type of fall from which the worker is tobe protected. OSHA believes the use of a 400 pound weight to test the systemis sufficient to insure that a proper margin of safety is obtained. Paragraph (b)(5) of andSection; 1915.203 requires safety nets to be inspectedweekly for mildew, wear, damage, or other deterioration. Defective componentsmust be removed from service. Public comment is requested on the frequencyof inspection in the Specific Issues section of this preamble. Paragraph (b)(6) of andSection; 1915.203 requires debris and tools to beremoved as soon as possible from the net, but not later than the startof the next work shift. Such obstacles pose obvious safety hazards to anyonewho falls into the net. Paragraph (b)(7) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies the maximum allowablemesh opening and provides for a maximum of six inches on any side of anopening. The proposal also limits the size of the opening to a maximumof 36 square inches. This limit is proposed because mesh openings can bemanufactured with more than four six-inch sides. A limit of 36 square inchesis necessary to keep the open mesh from being so large that an employee'shead could go into it during a fall and possibly break the employee's neck.The provision is essentially the same as paragraph 5.1 of the 1979 ANSIrequirements for safety nets. Paragraph (b)(8) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies a minimum breaking strengthof 5,000 pounds for border ropes used for net webbing. This is the samerequirement as in paragraph 5.2 of the 1979 ANSI requirements for safetynets. Paragraph (b)(9) of andSection; 1915.203 requires connections between netpanels to be as strong as integral components, and to be spaced not morethan six inches apart. This is essentially the same requirement as andSection;1926.105(f), except the six inch requirement is based on the 1979 ANSIrequirement contained in paragraph 9.3. <T3>Paragraph 1915.203(c)_Covers. </T3>This paragraph, which is based onandSection; 1910.23(e)(7) and (8), sets the performance criteria for coversused to protect employees from falling into or through holes in floors,roofs, roadways, vehicular aisles, and other walking/working surfaces onshore. Public comment is requested in the Specific Issues section of thispreamble as to whether or not these provisions should also apply to vessels,vessel sections, and vessel means of access. Paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.203 requires covers in roadways andvehicular aisles to be capable of supporting at least twice the maximumaxle load of the largest vehicle expected to cross over the cover. Thisis a change from the andSection; 1910.23(e)(7) requirement that covers becapable of supporting at least 20,000 pounds, and is intended to reflectmore accurately actual workplace conditions. Existing covers in use wouldbe ``grandfathered.'' Public comment is requested on this point in theSpecific Issues section of this preamble. Paragraph (c)(2) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies the minimum strength requirementsfor all other covers. Whereas the existing rule, andSection; 1910.23(e)(7)(iii),requires all other covers to meet unstated ``strength requirements,'' theproposed rule specifies that the covers be capable of withstanding themaximum total anticipated load, or 250 pounds, whichever is greater. This250 pound minimum capacity is based on what OSHA considers to be the averagemaximum weight of an employee and the employee's tools. Paragraph (c)(3) of andSection; 1915.203 is a requirement for covers to beinstalled so as to prevent accidental displacement. Paragraph (c)(4) of andSection; 1915.203 requires that covers over steampits not be made of plywood, and is a new provision. Plywood covers whichbecome steam-saturated can easily delaminate and become incapable of supportinga load, although they appear to be as strong as when first installed. <T3>Paragraph (d)_Protection from falling objects. </T3>This paragraphsets forth the performance criteria for providing protection from fallingobjects as required by andSection; 1915.202. Paragraph (d)(1) of andSection;1915.203 requires toeboards, when used, to be erected along the edges ofoverhead walking/working surfaces for a distance sufficient to protectemployees using the point of access below. This is essentially the sameprovision as contained in andSection; 1910.23(c)(1)(i), and in andSection;1915.71(j)(5) as currently applied to shipyards. Paragraph (d)(2) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies the minimum strength oftoeboards. This requirement is the equivalent performance requirement toexisting requirements andSection;andSection; 1910.23(e)(4) and 1915.71(j)(5).Paragraph (d)(3) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies how toeboards are to beinstalled, and is essentially the same as andSection; 1910.23(e)(4). Paragraph (d)(4) of andSection; 1915.203 provides that additional protectionmust be used, where tools, equipment, or materials are higher than thetop of a toeboard, such as paneling or screening erected from the workinglevel or toeboard to the top of the toprail or midrail. This requirementis substantively the same as andSection; 1910.23(e)(4). Paragraph (d)(5) of andSection; 1915.203 requires that when guardrail systemsare used to prevent objects from falling, the openings in the system mustbe small enough to retain the potential falling objects. This is essentiallythe same requirement as andSection; 1910.23(e)(4), except the specific limitationson hole size are deleted, and the provision applies to all such guardsand not just toeboards. <ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Subpart M_Guardrail Systems </ITAG>This appendix is a non-mandatory set of guidelines provided to assist employersin complying with the requirements of paragraphs (a)(3), (4), (5), and(d)(2) of andSection; 1915.203. The guidelines are taken from the existingregulations as discussed above. An employer may use these guidelines asa starting point for designing guardrail and toeboard systems. However,the guidelines do not provide all the information necessary to build acomplete system, and the employer is still responsible for designing andassembling these components in such a way that the completed system willmeet the requirements of paragraphs (a)(3), (4), (5), and (d)(2) of andSection;1915.203. Components for which no specific guidelines are given in theappendix (e.g. joints, base connections, components made with other materials,and components with other dimensions) must also be designed and constructedin such a way that the completed system will meet the capacity requirementsof paragraphs (a)(3), (4), (5), and (d)(2) of andSection; 1915.203. The appendixneither creates additional obligations nor eliminates obligations otherwisecontained in the standard. It is intended to provide useful, explanatorymaterial and information to employers and employees who wish to use itto aid in understanding and complying with the standard. Specific Issues In addition to any other comments on this subpart, the public is requestedto comment on the following specific issues: 1. Paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of andSection; 1915.201 lists several areas wherefall protection would not be required. Public comment is requested on whetherthis list is too limited or too broad. Comments requesting that specificareas of activities be added to the list should demonstrate why fall protectionis not necessary. Comments requesting that the list of exceptions be narrowedshould describe the fall protection systems and procedures that are availableand feasible for use in the specified area. In addition, public comment is requested on whether or not there are areasor operations, in addition to those already identified in proposed andSection;1915.202(b) and andSection; 1915.202(c), which have unique fall protectionrequirements not presently addressed by the proposed standards. Commentson this point should describe such areas and operations in detail, andshould discuss the fall protection system or work practices which shouldbe used. 2. Paragraph (b)(1) of andSection; 1915.202 allows the use of U-guards asfall protection on manholes and other small openings aboard vessels. Commentis requested on whether or not such guards should be allowed. If such guardsshould be allowed, comment is requested on whether or not any or all ofthe provisions of andSection; 1915.203(a) are appropriate criteria and shouldapply. Comment is also requested on whether or not there are any otherrelevant considerations that should be addressed pertaining to the properuse of such guards. 3. Paragraph (b)(4) of andSection; 1915.202 requires employees to wear personalflotation devices when working near unprotected sides and edges of decks,platforms, flats, and similar surfaces above water on vessels afloat. Commentis requested on whether or not this requirement should apply aboard allvessels with unprotected sides and edges above water, and not just thoseafloat. An example of where this may be appropriate is a vessel on a marinerailway which has been partially hauled out of the water for work, andwhich has a portion of its deck edges over water. Similarly, public commentis requested on whether or not this requirement should apply any time anemployee is working near unprotected sides and edges of shore facilitieswhich are above water (i.e., wharves, piers, docks, and buildings). 4. What are appropriate fall protection requirements for vessel sectionsin assembly areas adjacent to building ways or vessels that are being workedon? These sections are often placed on large tables which are four or morefeet above ground levels and which, therefore, almost always create a fallpotential of four feet or more. However, the work on such sections maybe of a relatively short duration compared to the time and exposure necessaryto install guardrail systems or anchorages for personal fall protectionequipment. Other sections can be quite large with correspondingly greaterexposure to fall hazards which outweigh the installation considerations.5. Paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1915.202 requires fall protection wheneveremployees are working ashore on walking/working surfaces with unprotectedsides and edges which are four feet or more above lower levels. This isthe same general rule as in Part 1910, which OSHA considers to be applicableto those areas of shipyards not presently covered by Part 1915. However,some existing rules developed specifically to reflect shipyard considerations(see andSection;andSection; 1915.71 (j), (k), 1915.73(d), and 1915.77(c)) specifythe limit to be five feet in certain specified areas. These rules haveled some yards to consider the five-foot limit to be applicable in allshipyard areas (with certain exceptions for scaffolds covered by Part 1910)and have provided fall protection systems accordingly. Public comment isrequested on whether the appropriate limit should be four feet or fivefeet. Comments should include appropriate cost and injury data, and, asappropriate, discuss the necessity to ``grandfather'' existing five footinstallations. 6. Paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 1915.203 specifies three different minimumguardrail system heights, depending on where the system is installed. Commentis requested on whether all systems should be required to meet the 39 to45 inch (42 inch nominal) requirement, and if not, what factors supportthe use of different guardrail heights. 7. Paragraph (b)(5) of andSection; 1915.203 requires safety nets to be inspectedweekly for deterioration. Comment is requested on whether or not this periodof time is appropriate or if some lesser or greater period should be required,and the reason for the period selected. 8. Paragraph (c) of andSection; 1915.202 requires all hole covers not onvessels, vessel sections, or vessel means of access to meet certain specifiedcriteria. Comment is requested on what criteria should be used for coversused on vessels (other than those which are an integral part of a vessel),vessel sections, and vessel means of access, and the basis for establishingsuch criteria. 9. Should OSHA promulgate a rule requiring covers to be painted or otherwiseclearly marked to indicate their function as a cover? Covers are oftenonly pieces of plywood, and the purpose of this rule would be to help employeesdistinguish between a covered hole and debris. 10. Paragraphs (b)(1) through (3), (b)(6) and (b)(10) of andSection; 1915.202require the use of guardrails on vessels when such use is practicable.These provisions are based on existing provisions andSection; 1915.73(b)through (d), (f), and andSection; 1915.75(e). Public comment is requestedon the actual conditions that must exist before these provisions becomeimpracticable. In addition, public comment, is requested on the need touse other fall protection systems when guardrails are impractical; whatthese other systems should be; and the circumstances in which these othersystems are appropriate for use. 11. Should OSHA promulgate rules requiring the inspection of work surfacesto determine their structural integrity prior to employees being requiredto work on such surfaces? Currently, there are no specific requirementsthat address this concern. The purpose of these inspections would be toinsure that work surfaces have the requisite strength so as not to collapseunder the weight of employees, tools, and materials. That such a rule maybe needed is evidenced by a study conducted by OSHA (Ref. 2, page 77).That study shows that of eight fatalities of employees falling throughceilings, four of the accidents were caused by the work surface not beingcapable of supporting the employee's weight. The study also shows thatof 55 fatalities resulting from falls from roof levels, approximately eightwere caused by the employees working on surfaces with insufficient structuralstrength to support their weight. Comments should address the types ofinspection criterial necessary, the methods to be used, and the qualificationsof the inspectors. 12. Paragraph (d) of andSection; 1915.202 allows protective canopies to beerected as an alternative form of falling object protection. Comments arerequested on whether or not the folowing criteria, based on existing constructionsafety standards, would be appropriate for shipyard application: ``Canopiesshall be erected not more than nine feet above the work surface, and shallconsist of two inch planking, or material of equivalent strength, laidtight, and extending the width and length of the impact area.'' If thiscriteria should not be used, what criteria should be specified in andSection;1915.203(d) to assure proper protection for employees? 13. Paragraph (d)(9) of andSection; 1915.202 allows guardrail systems tobe removed where necessary to permit line handling of floating dry docks.Comment is requested on whether or not personal flotation devices shouldbe required on employees when guardrails are removed, and under what conditionssuch protection is necessary. 14. Many shipyards have the capability of floating a ship into a fixedarea where the water can be removed and the ship drydocked. Such areasare variously termed graving docks, graving basins, basins, drydocks (asopposed to ``floating drydocks, ship ways, and other terms. Comment isrequested on whether or not there is one term which can be used to describethese areas. If not, comment is requested on what other terms are alsoused to describe these areas so that OSHA may combine them into one defintion.15. Paragraphs (a) (11) through (15) of andSection; 1915.203 specify requirementsfor the use of guardrail systems which are not on vessels, vessel sections,and vessel means of access. The requirements address materials handlingaccess areas, holes, personnel access, and narrow ramps. Comment is requestedon whether or not these rules should also apply to vessels, vessel sections,and vessel means of access. 16. Paragraph (c)(4)(ii) of andSection; 1915.202 allows the use of an attendantto protect an opening in a walking/working surface when a cover is openor removed. This provision is based on existing provisions andSection; 1910.23(a)(5)through (8). Public comment is requested on whether or not this is an appropriatemethod of fall protection, and whether any conditions should be placedon its use. 17. OSHA is proposing to revise its provisions covering the minimum heightof guardrail systems (andSection; 1915.203(a)(1)(i)), the minimum heightof wall openings before guardrail protection is required (andSection; 1915.202(c)(5)),and the minimum strength of covers (andSection; 1915.203(c)(1) and (2)).These changes would bring the shipyard employment standards into conformancewith similar provisions being developed for the construction industry safetystandards and the general industry safety standards. However, as notedin the Summary and explanation of the Proposal, OSHA proposes to ``grandfather''certain existing situations with respect to these provisions. Public commentis requested on whether or not existing guardrail systems, wall openings,and covers should be ``grandfathered,'' and whether or not other facilitiesshould be ``grandfathered.'' Comments should include a discussion of relatedcost, injury, and feasibility data. 18. Both the current andSection; 1910.23(c) and the proposed andSection; 1915.202(c)require fall protection systems to be erected or used at all unprotectedsides and edges of floors (open-sided floors) and similar walking-workingsurfaces. As worded, the existing provision can be interpreted to meanthat a guardrail is required around an open-sided floor even when employeeson the floor are working near the middle of the floor and are removed fromthe perimeter fall hazard. The proposed language could also be interpretedto require the same degree of protection. The existing provision can alsobe interpreted to mean that a citation for lack of fall protection shouldbe issued only when employees are working near the unprotected side oredge and are thus exposed to the fall hazard. Public comment is requestedon whether or not a distance (or some other method of defining exposure)should be specified whereby fall protection would be required only whenan employee is within that distance of a fall hazard. Proponents of sucha limit should state what that distance should be, and why. Proponentsof the existing language, as modified in the proposal, should state whya limit would not be appropriate. All comments should include appropriatecost and injury data.19. In some of the exisiting provisions and in some of the proposed provisions,OSHA uses specific numerical limits to define and clarify the duties setforth. For example, existing andSection; 1915.73(d) and proposed andSection;1915.203(a)(ii) require guardrail systems to be used around all open hatchesnot protected by coamings at least 24 inches high. These and other limitsare based on existing laws and consensus standards, and are used in lieuof more performance-oriented language such as ``guardrails shall be usedaround all hatches where there is a fall hazard,'' or language which requiresa numerical limit but then allows other configurations which give ``equivalent''protection. OSHA believes that although such performance-oriented languagewould be less restrictive on employers, and thus give them more optionswhen abating a hazard, it does not always tell the employer exactly whatis required (i.e., how to do something ``right''). On the other hand, requiringspecific numerical limits in the rule and allowing the employer to useother limits which the employer can show will provide ``equivalent'' protectionmay respond to both these concerns. OSHA believes that the use of specificlimits in certain provisions (such as those listed above) provides therequired notice to employers as to how they can comply with a provisioncompared to how OSHA intends to enforce the provision. OSHA believes thatsuch notice serves to inform employers and employees about the proper wayto do things; promotes consistency in hazard abatement at all worksites;and also minimizes legal disputes over the intent of a requirement. Onthe other hand, specification language can increase costs without increasingsafety, discourage technical innovation, prevent the use of safe alternatives,and fail to anticipate the varying needs and situations in the numerousworkplaces covered by the standard.Public comment is requested on whether or not OSHA's use of specificationlanguage is appropriate, or if it should be moved to a non-mandatory appendixwhich could provide guidance to employers. If not, how should the provisionsbe written to provide the desired flexibility and the required fair notice?If the continued use of such limits is appropriate, are the proposed limitssufficient to abate the hazards? Comments should include appropriate costand injury data.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. American National Standard ANSI A10.11-1979, <T3>American National Standard for Safety Nets Used During Construction,Repair, and Demolition Operations,</T3> American National Standards Institute,New York.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration,<T3> Occupational Fatalities Related to Roofs, Ceilings, and Floors asFound in Reports of OSHA Fatality/Catastrophe Investigations,</T3> November1979.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Yancy, Carino and Sansalone, <T3>Perimeter Safety Net Projection Requirements,</T3> Center for BuildingTechnology, National Bureau of Standards, Washington, DC, May 1986 (NBSIR85-3271).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">IV. Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment and Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis</ITAG>Introduction and SummaryIn accordance with Executive Order No. 12291 (46 FR 13193, February 17,1981), OSHA has analyzed the economic impact of this proposed standard.Under the criteria established in E.O. 12291, OSHA has determined thatthe promulgation of this proposed revision would not be a ``major'' action.The expected annualized costs of full compliance would be about $305,000.BackgroundUnder Executive Order 12291, OSHA is required, in general, to submit anyNotice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) for ``all rules other than major rules''to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) at least 10days prior to publication in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>In light of the data currently available to OSHA, the economic impact estimatespresented in this preamble are rough estimates which are likely to be refinedas OSHA receives additional information.OSHA solicits further comments on the estimates presented in this preambleand those comments will be addressed and incorporated in the RegulatoryImpact Assessment (RIA) for the final rule.Data SourcesThe primary source for this section is the November 1985, Draft Final Reportby CONSAD Research Corporation entitled, ``Data to Support a RegulatoryAnalysis of the Proposed Standard for shipbuilding and Repairing.'' Inaddition, OSHA also used an October 1984 report by Main Hurdman/KMG entitled,``Profile of the Shipbuilding and Repairing Industry.''Industry ProfileThe entire shipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking industries wouldbe affected by the proposed consolidation of the fall protection sectionsof the existing Part 1915, Subpart E, and the existing Part 1910, SubpartD. In recent years, shipyards have not prospered as an industry. By wayof illustration, there were about 305 shipyards operating in 1986 whichis fewer than half of the 687 shipyards active in 1982. Another illustrationis that there were orders for 69 merchant vessels (1.82 million tons) inU.S. shipyards in 1980 but no new orders for merchant vessels since 1985.Although this loss of business has been partially offset by the increasein the U.S. Navy's demands for ships, the decline in the demand for commercialships will likely generate a further decline in the number of active shipyards.Population-at-RiskOSHA has estimated that every shipyard employee frequently works at anelevation that would require the worker to be protected from falling. Theactual number of these employees will depend upon the level of shipyardwork. For example, shipyards employed 177,300 workers in 1980 and about136,300 workers in 1986. Consequently, given the potential for large changesin the demand for this industry's product, OSHA has estimated that thepopulation-at-risk would be between 136,300 and 180,000 employees.Risk of Fatality or InjuryOSHA has estimated that the annual number of injuries in shipyards dueto falls from those elevations covered under this subpart was between 905and 1,460 between 1981 and 1986. Of these injuries, 460 to 825 were lostworkday injuries. As the average number of lost workdays per lost shipyardworkday injury was between 20.4 and 26, OSHA has estimated that the annualnumber of lost workdays in shipyards due to falls from elevations wouldbe between 10,330 days and 16,980 days.In addition, OSHA has determined that there would be between one and twoannual fatalities in shipyards associated with falls from elevations.Feasibility, Benefits, and CostsOSHA has determined that this proposed standard would be technologicallyfeasible because it would permit the use of existing and readily availabletechnology and equipment.There are two potential sources of benefits from this proposed standard.The first source is the benefits that would accrue to those workers whoare at risk from current practices involving working at elevations in shipyards.OSHA believes that the proposed consolidation of Parts 1910 and 1915 wouldlikely lead to an increase in future compliance levels because consolidatingtwo sets of these requirements into one set would clarify the rules. Inaddition, the proposal substitutes performance language for much of theexisting specification language. Consequently, it could make complianceless costly while maintaining employee safety. Thus, the proposed consolidationmay lead to an increase in compliance which, in turn, may lead to an increasein employee safety during work at elevations.The second source is the benefits and decreased costs that should accrueto those employers who would be allowed to use certain safety systems andequipment that are not allowed by the existing specification requirementsbut would provide the same level of employee safety as that generated bythe specifications. The use of these systems and equipment would allowemployers to provide the necessary level of safety for their employeesat less cost than is possible under the existing standards.OSHA does not have any quantitative estimates of these potential benefitsand is requesting information and comments on this issue. As this is aPreliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment (PRIA), all comments will be carefullyanalyzed by OSHA for incorporation into the RIA for the final rule.The basis of the estimated costs of compliance with the proposed standardis the CONSAD Report. In order to obtain this information, CONSAD circulatedcopies of the draft proposed standards to the two major industry tradeassociations and to individual shipbuilders. CONSAD then employed telephonequestionnaires and site visits to elicit information concerning the potentialeconomic impact of the provisions contained in the draft proposed consolidatedstandard. The information was used by CONSAD to develop its estimates ofthe costs of compliance and those costs have been adopted by OSHA as theexpected costs of compliance with the proposed standards.Based on the CONSAD report, OSHA has determined that there is one provisionthat would involve costs of compliance. The proposed consolidation requiresthat all new guardrails and temporary guardrails have a minimum toprailheight of 39 inches. Existing guardrail systems, however, are exemptedfrom this provision.Using the baseline of existing industry practice, OSHA has estimated theannualized costs of compliance with the proposed consolidation to be about$305,000. Nevertheless, as previously mentioned, this is a preliminaryRIA and OSHA invites public comment concerning this estimate. Any commentreceived will be carefully analyzed by OSHA for incorporation into theRIA for this final rule.Regulatory Flexibility CertificationPursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq</T3>), the Assistant Secretary has preliminarily certified thatthe proposal would not have a significant impact upon a substantial numberof small entities. OSHA invites public comment concerning this certification.The important criterion that governs a Regulatory Flexibility Analysisis whether the proposed standard would impose significant costs upon smallentities. ``Significance'' is determined by the impact upon profits, marketshare, and on the entity's financial viability. In particular, the proposedstandard's effect upon small entities relative to that upon large entitiesneeds to be specifically evaluated. That is, OSHA must determine whetherthe proposal would have a relatively greater negative effect on small entitiesthan on large entities, thereby putting small entities at a competitivedisadvantage.The proposed standard, however, has no changes that would require significantcapital expenditures. Furthermore, as these proposed provisions are moreperformance-oriented than specification-oriented, small entities can usecost-effective methods of employee protection best suited to their particularwork situations. The costs of compliance with the proposed standard primarilydepend upon the amount of work at elevations and upon the number of employees,both of which typically depend upon the size of the firm. There are, however,some economies of scale in compliance and the costs of compliance expressedas a percentage of total revenues would be slightly larger for very smallfirms (fewer than 50 employees) than for very large firms (greater than1,000 employees). Nevertheless, these compliance costs would be a minimalcomponent of the overall cost of the shipyard production. As a result,this proposed standard would not put small entities at a competitive disadvantagerelative to large entities.Thus, OSHA has concluded that this proposed standard would not have a significantadverse impact upon a substantial number of small entities.The assessment is available for inspection and copying at the OSHA TechnicalData Center, Room N-3670, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC20210. OSHA invites comments concerning the conclusions reached in boththe Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment and the Regulatory FlexibilityCertification.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Environmental Assessment</ITAG>Finding of No Significant ImpactThis proposed rule and its major alternatives have been reviewed in accordancewith the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Guidelines of the Council of Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Parts1500 through 1517), and Department of Labor's NEPA Procedures(29 CFR Part 11). As a result of this review, the Assistant Secretary ofOSHA has determined that the proposed rule will have no significant environmentalimpact.The proposed revisions focus on the reduction of accidents or injuriesby means of work practices and procedures, and proper use and handlingof equipment. The proposal also contains language, definition, and formatchanges. These revisions do not impact on air, water, or soil quality,plant or animal life, the use of land, or other aspects of the environment.Therefore, these revisions are categorized as excluded actions accordingto Subpart B, andSection; 11.10, of the DOL NEPA regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Recordkeeping</ITAG>This proposal contains no recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Public Participation</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to submit written data, views, and argumentswith respect to this proposal. The comments must be postmarked by February27, 1989, and submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Office, Docket No.S-046, U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration,Room N-2634, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.The data, views, and arguments that are submitted will be available forpublic inspection and copying at the above address. All timely submissionsreceived will be made a part of the record of this proceeding.Additionally, under section 6(b)(3) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C. 655) and29 CFR 1911.11, interested parties may file objections to the proposaland request an informal hearing. The objections and hearing requests shouldbe submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Office at the address aboveand must comply with the following conditions:1. The objections and hearing requests must include the name and addressof the individual or organization making the objection or request;2. The objections and hearing requests must be postmarked by February 27,1989.3. The objections and hearing requests must specify with particularitythe provisions of the proposed rule to which each objection is taken orabout which the hearing request is made, and must state the grounds therefore;4. Each objection and hearing request must be separately stated and numbered;and 5. The objections and hearing requests must be accompanied by a detailedsummary of the evidence proposed to be adduced at the requested hearing.Interested persons who have objections to various provisions or have changesto recommend may of course make these objections or recommendations intheir comments and OSHA will fully consider them. There is only need tofile formal ``objections'' separately if the interested person desiresto request an oral hearing.OSHA recognizes that there may also be interested persons who, throughtheir knowledge of safety or their experience in the operations involved,would wish to endorse or support certain provisions in the standard. OSHAwelcomes such supportive comments, including any pertinent accident dataor cost information which may be available, in order that the record ofthis rulemaking will present a balanced picture of the public responseon the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. State Plan Standards</ITAG>The 25 States and territories having OSHA-approved occupational safetyand health plans which cover the issues of maritime safety and health mustrevise their existing standard within six months of the publication dateof the final standard or show OSHA why there is no need for action, e.g.,because an existing State standard covering this area is already ``at leastas effective'' as the revised Federal standard. Currently five States (California,Minnesota, Oregon, Vermont and Washington) with their own State plans coverprivate sector on-shore maritime activities. Federal OSHA enforces maritimestandards offshore in all states and provides onshore coverage of maritimeactivities in Federal OSHA States and in the following State plan Statesand territories: Alaska, Arizona, Connecticut \1\<NOTE/>, Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Nevada,New Mexico, New York, \1\ North Carolina, Puerto Rico, South Carolina,Tennessee, Utah, Virginia, Virgin Islands, and Wyoming. (All States withState plans must also extend coverage to State and local government employeesengaged in maritime activities.)<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Plan covers only State and local government employees.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1915 </ITAG>Guardrail systems, Marine safety, Occupational safety and health, Personalflotation devices, Personal fall protection equipment, Safety, Safety nets,Ship repair, Shipyard employment, Vessels. <ITAG tagnum="84">Authority </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of John A. Pendergrass,Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6 and 8 of the Occupational Safetyand Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), section 41 of the Longshoreand Harbor Worker's Compensation Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. 941), Secretaryof Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), and 29 CFR Part 1911, it is proposedto amend 29 CFR Part 1915 as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 17th day of November, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1915_[Amended] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1915 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 41, Longshore and Harbor Workers, CompensationAct (33 U.S.C. 941); secs. 4, 6, and 8, Occupational Safety and HealthAct of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71(36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736) as applicable;and 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. 29 CFR Part 1915 would be amended by adding a new Subpart M to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart M_Fall Protection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.201 Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.202 Requirements to have fall protection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.203 Fall protection systems criteria and practices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A to Subpart M_Guardrail Systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart M_Fall Protection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1915.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>(1) This subpart sets forth requirementsfor fall protection to be provided for and used by employees in shipyardworkplaces and operations (including shipbuilding, ship repairing, andshipbreaking), but does not apply to construction operations in shipyardscovered under 29 CFR Part 1926. (2) The provisions of 29 CFR 1910.21, 1910.22(b), 1910.22(c), and 1910.23do not apply to shipyard workplaces and operations. (3) Section 1915.202 sets forth those shipyard workplaces, conditions,operations, and circumstances for which fall protection shall be providedand used, except as follows: (i) Provisions requiring fall protection for employees on stairways andladders are provided in andSection;andSection;1915.71 through 1915.90 of thispart (Subpart E). (ii) Provisions requiring fall protection for employees on scaffolds areprovided in andSection;andSection;1915.251 through 1915.253 of this part (SubpartN). (4) Section 1915.203 sets forth the requirements for the installation,construction, and use of guardrail systems, safety net systems, covers,and falling object protection required by the part. Criteria for personalfall arrest systems, positioning device systems, and personal flotationdevices are provided in andSection;andSection;1915.151 through 1915.160 ofthis part (Subpart I). (5) Facilities or equipment installed prior to 30 days after date of publicationof the final rule in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>may comply with the requirements in brackets([ ]) in this subpart in lieu of the corresponding unbracketed requirements.(b) <T3>Definitions applicable to this subpart. </T3>``Dangerous equipment'' means equipment such as machinery, electrical equipment,and other units which, as a result of form or function, may be hazardousto employees who fall onto or into such equipment. ``Equivalent'' means alternative designs, materials, or methods which theemployer can demonstrate will provide an equal or greater degree of safetyfor employees than the method or item specified in the standard. ``Failure'' means load refusal, breakage, or separation of component parts.Load refusal is the point where the ultimate strength is exceeded. ``Guardrail system'' means a vertical barrier, normally consisting of,but not limited to, an assembly of toprails, midrails, and posts, erectedto prevent employees from falling to lower levels.   ``Lower levels'' means those areas to which an employee can fall. Suchareas include ground levels, decks, flats, docks, floors, roofs, ramps,gangways, grates, piers, wharves, runways, excavations, pits, tanks, material,water, equipment, and other surfaces.``Personal fall arrest system'' means a combination of body belt or bodyharness, and lanyard, deceleration device, lifeline, and point of anchorage.``Personal flotation device'' means a life-jacket type vest used to provideflotation assistance.``Positioning device system'' means a body belt or body harness systemrigged to allow an employee to be supported on an elevated vertical surface,such as a wall or ship's funnel, and to work with both hands free whileleaning backwards.``Qualified person'' means one who, by possession of a recognized degree,certificate, or professional standing, or who by extensive knowledge, training,and experience, has successfully demonstrated the ability to solve or resolvesafety problems relating to the subject matter, the work, or the project.``Toeboard'' means a low protective barrier to prevent the fall of materialsand equipment to lower levels.``U-guard'' means a barrier shaped like an inverted ``U'' which is usedat manhole openings on vessels to provide fall protection. These guardsare also known as ``hairpins,'' ``fieldgoals,'' and ``horseshoes.''``Unprotected sides and edges'' means any side or edge (except at entrancesto points of access) of a deck, platform, flat (or similar surface on avessel), floor, roof, ramp, catwalk, or runway where there is no wall orguardrail system at least 39 inches (1.0m) [Grandfather provisions: 36inches (0.9m); see andSection; 1915.201(a)(3)] high.``Vessel section'' means a sub-assembly, module, or other component ofa vessel being built, repaired, or broken.``Walking/working surface'' means any surface on which employees must belocated in order to perform their job duties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements to have fall protection.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) All fall protection shall be installed before employeesbegin any other work on or from the surface or area where fall protectionis required.(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to unprotected sides andedges of the top, waterside, walking/working surface of wharves, piers,and quays, nor to the loading side of loading docks, nor to assembly tables,vehicles, or trailers.(b) <T3>Fall protection on vessels, vessel sections, and vessel means of access.</T3>Employees on decks and other walking/working surfaces aboard vessels,vessel sections, and on vessel means of access shall be protected fromfall hazards as follows:(1) Employees working near flush manholes and other small openings of comparablesize in the deck and other working surfaces shall be protected by the useof covers, guardrail systems, or U-guards, except where the use of suchprotection is made impracticable as a result of the nature of the workactually in progress.(2) Employees working near open hatches not protected by coamings to aheight of 24 inches (61 cm), and employees working near all other largeopenings shall be protected by the use of guardrail systems, except wherethe use of such guards is made impracticable as a result of the natureof the work actually in progress.(3) Employees working near unprotected sides and edges of decks, platforms,flats, and similar flat surfaces more than five feet (1.5 m) above lowerlevels (except water) shall be protected by the use of guardrail systems,except where the use of such guards is made impracticable as result ofthe nature of the work actually in progress.(4) Employees working near unprotected sides and edges of decks, platforms,flats, and similar surfaces above water on vessels afloat shall be protectedby personal flotation devices.(5) Employees boarding, leaving, or working from small boats or floatsshall be protected by personal flotation devices.(6) Sections of bilges from which floor plates or gratings have been removedshall be guarded by guardrails, except where the use of such guards ismade impracticable as a result of the nature of the work actually in progress.If these open sections are in a walkway, at least two 2 inch by 10 inchplanks placed side by side, or equivalent, shall be laid across the openingto provide a walking surface.(7) Gratings, walkways, and catwalks from which sections or ladders havebeen removed shall be barricaded with guardrails.(8) When firebox floors present tripping hazards of exposed tubing or ofmissing or removed refractory, planking shall be laid to afford safe footingwhile work is being carried on within the boiler.(9) Employees working near the edges of floating dry dock wing walls shallbe protected by guardrail systems. Sections of the railings may be temporarilyremoved where necessary to permit line handling while a vessel is enteringor leaving the dock.(10) Employees working on the deck of a floating dry dock where they areexposed to the hazard of falling into the water shall be protected by theuse of a guardrail system installed along the ends of the dry dock. Whensuch a railing would be impracticable, employees shall use personal fallarrest systems or positioning device systems rigged to prevent employeesfrom falling into the water.(11) Employees on gangways and turntables used for vessel access shallbe protected by guardrail systems. (c) <T3>Fall protection ashore. </T3>Employees not on vessels, vessel sections,or vessel means of access shall be protected from fall hazards as follows:(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (c)(2) through (c)(5) of this sectionbelow, employees on floors, roofs, ramps, walkways, graving dock edges,and other walking/working surfaces with unprotected sides and edges fourfeet (1.2 m) or more above lower levels, shall be protected by the useof guardrail systems. When the use of guardrail systems is impracticable,employees shall be protected by the use of personal fall arrest systems,positioning device systems, or safety net systems. (2) In areas where guardrail systems or portions of guardrail systems havebeen removed to allow the passage of materials, tools, or equipment, employeesshall be protected by the use of personal fall protection equipment. (3) Employees less than four feet (1.2 m) above dangerous equipment shallbe protected by guardrail systems or equipment guards. (4) Employees four feet (1.2 m) or more above dangerous equipment shallbe protected by guardrail systems, personal fall arrest systems, or safetynet systems. (5) Employees on floors, roofs, roadways, vehicular aisles, and other walking/workingsurfaces with holes (including skylights and open pits) into which employeescan accidentally walk shall be protected by covers or guardrail systems,or the hole shall be guarded by an attendant. (i) Covers used for protection shall be closed when the hole is not inuse. (ii) When the cover is open or removed, employees shall be protected byguardrail systems, or the hole shall be guarded by an attendant. (6) Employees exposed to the hazard of falling into tanks, vats, and similarenclosures shall be protected by guardrail systems or covers. (7) Employees working on, at, or near wall openings (including openingswith chutes attached) shall be protected from falling through or into thewall opening by the use of a guardrail system, whenever the outside bottomedge of the wall opening is more than four feet (1.2 m) above lower levelsand the inside bottom edge of the wall opening is less than 39 inches (1.0m) [Grandfather provisions: 36 inches (0.9 m); see andSection;1915.201(a)(3)]above the walking/working surface. (d) <T3>Protection from falling objects. </T3>Except as provided for scaffolds in Subpart N, employees, in addition towearing hardhats as required by andSection;1915.155 of this part, shall beprotected by falling object protection as necessary when they are on orimmediately adjacent to vessels or vessel sections. In addition, fallingobject protection shall be installed at all times at all other locationsbeneath which employees can pass, there is moving machinery, or there isequipment with which falling materials could create a hazard. Such protectionshall consist of toeboards, screens, or guardrail systems erected to preventobjects from being displaced from higher levels; or by canopy structureserected to deflect the falling objects. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1915.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fall protection systems criteria and practices. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Guardrail systems. </T3>Guardrail systems installed and used to meetthe requirements of this part shall comply with the following provisions:(1) The top edge height of toprails or equivalent guardrail system membersshall be as follows: (i) Thirty inches (76 cm) to 45 inches (114 cm) for systems installed aroundflush manholes and other small openings of comparable size located in decksand other walking/working surfaces aboard vessels and vessel components,and for systems installed on gangways and turntables (with the height measuredperpendicularly from the rail to the walking surface at the stanchion),and for systems installed on walkways and ramps used for vessel access.(ii) Thirty-six inches (92 cm) to 45 inches (114 cm) for systems installedaround open hatches not protected by coamings to a height of 24 inches(61 cm), and for systems installed around other large openings aboard vesselsand vessel components. (iii) Thirty-nine inches (99 cm) [Grandfather provisions: 36 inches (92cm); see andSection;1915.201(a)(3)] to 45 inches (114 cm) for systems installedon drydocks, edges of graving docks, and around all other fall hazard areas.(2) Midrails, screens, mesh, intermediate vertical members, or equivalentintermediate structural members shall be installed between the top edgeof the guardrail system and the walking/working surface where there isno wall or parapet wall at least 21 inches (53 cm) high. (i) Midrails, when used, shall be installed at a height midway betweenthe top edge of the guardrail system and the top of the walking/workingsurface where there is no wall or parapet wall at least 21 inches (53 cm)high. (ii) Screens and mesh, when used, shall extend from the toprail to thewalking/working surface, and along the entire opening between toprail supports.(iii) Intermediate vertical members (such as balusters), when used betweenposts, shall be not more than 19 inches (.48 cm) apart. (iv) Other structural members shall be installed such that there are noopenings in the guardrail system that are more than 19 inches (.48 m) wide.(3) Guardrail systems shall be capable of withstanding, without failure,a force of at least 200 pounds (890 N) applied within two inches (5.1 cm)of the top edge, in any outward or downward direction, at any point alongthe top edge. (4) When the 200 pound (890 N) test load specified in paragraph (a)(3)is applied in a downward direction, the top edge of the guardrail systemshall not deflect to a height less than the minimum heights specified inparagraph (a)(1) above. (5) Midrails, screens, mesh, intermediate vertical members, solid panels,and equivalent structural members shall be capable of withstanding, withoutfailure, a force of at least 150 pounds (666 n) applied in any downwardor outward direction at any point along the midrail or other member. Guardrailsystems on gangways on vessels inspected and certified by the U.S. CoastGuard will be deemed to meet the requirements of paragraphs (a)(3) through(a)(5) of this section, except in cases where the vessel's regular gangwayis not being used. (6) Guardrail systems shall be so surfaced as to prevent injury to an employeefrom punctures or lacerations, and to prevent snagging of clothing whichcould cause an employee to fall. (7) The ends of all toprails and midrails shall not overhang the terminalposts except where such overhang does not constitute a projection hazard.(8) Steel banding and plastic banding shall not be used as toprails ormidrails. (9) Toprails and midrails shall be at least one-quarter inch (0.8 cm) nominaldiameter or thickness.(10) When guardrail systems are exposed to hot work (i.e., welding, burning,or other heat producing operations) or corrosive chemicals, manila or syntheticfiber rope rails shall not be used. (11) When guardrail systems are used at materials, tools, or equipmenthandling areas, a chain, gate or removable guardrail section shall be placedacross all access openings between guardrail sections when handling operationsare not taking place. (12) When guardrail systems are used at holes or openings in walking/workingsurfaces, they shall be erected on all unprotected sides and edges of thehole or opening. (13) When guardrail systems are used around holes or openings used forthe passage of materials, the hole or opening may have not more than twosides provided with removable guardrail sections to allow the passage ofmaterials. (14) When guardrail systems are used around holes or openings which areused as personnel points of access (such as ladderways), they shall beprovided with a gate or be so offset that a person cannot walk directlyinto the hole. (15) Guardrail systems on ramps and runways shall be erected along eachunprotected side or edge; however, when operating conditions preclude installationof a guardrail system along both sides, the guardrail system may be omittedalong one side if the ramp or runway is at least 18 inches (.5 m) wide.(b) <T3>Safety net systems. </T3>Safety net systems installed and used to meetthe requirements of this Part shall comply with the following provisions:(1) Safety nets shall extend outward at least 15 feet (4.6 m) from theoutermost projection of the work surface. (2) Safety nets shall be installed as close as practicable under the walking/workingsurface on which employees are working, but in no case more than 25 feet(7.7 m) below such level. (3) Safety nets shall be installed with sufficient clearance under themto prevent contact with the surface or structure below when subjected toan impact force equal to the drop test specified in paragraph (b)(4) ofthis section. (4) Safety nets and their installations shall be capable of absorbing withoutfailure an impact force equal to that produced by the drop test specifiedin paragraph (b)(4)(i) of this section. (i) Safety nets and safety net installations shall be drop-tested at thejobsite before being used as a fall protection system. The drop-test shallconsist of a 400 pound (180 kg) bag of sand 30 andplusmin; 2 inches (76 andplusmin;5 cm) in diameter dropped into the net from the highest walking/workingsurface on which employees are to be protected. (ii) <T3>EXCEPTION: </T3>When the employer can demonstrate that a drop-testis not practicable, the net and net installation shall be certified bya qualified person to be in compliance with the provisions of paragraphs(b)(3) and (b)(4)(i) of this section. (5) Safety nets shall be inspected weekly for mildew, wear, damage, andother deterioration, and defective components shall be removed from service.(6) Materials, scrap pieces, and tools which have fallen into the safetynet shall be removed as soon as possible from the net and at least beforethe next work shift. (7) The maximum size of each safety net mesh opening shall not exceed 36square inches (225 cm2) nor be longer than six inches (15 cm) on any sidemeasured center-to-center of mesh ropes or webbing. All mesh crossingsshall be secured to prevent enlargement of the mesh opening. (8) Each safety net (or section of it) shall have a border rope for webbingwith a minimum breaking strength of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN). (9) Connections between safety net panels shall be as strong as integralnet components and shall be spaced not more than six inches (15 cm) apart.(c) <T3>Covers. </T3>Covers for holes in floors, roofs (including skylights),roadways, vehicular aisles, and other walking/working surfaces which arenot on vessels, vessel sections, or vessel means of access, shall complywith the following provisions: (1) Covers located in roadways and vehicular aisles shall be capable ofsupporting, without failure, at least twice the maximum axle load of thelargest vehicle expected to cross over the hole [Grandfather provisions:20,000 pounds (9,120 kg); See andSection;1915.201(a)(3)]. (2) All other covers shall be capable of supporting, without failure, themaximum total anticipated load of employees, equipment, and materials tobe applied to the cover at any one time, or 250 pounds (114 kg), whicheveris greater [Grandfather provisions: 200 pounds (91 kg); See andSection;1915.201(a)(3)].(3) All covers shall be installed so as to prevent accidental displacement.(4) Covers over steam pits shall not be made of plywood. (d) <T3>Protection from falling objects. </T3>Falling object protection installedand used to meet the requirements of this Part shall comply with the followingprovisions: (1) Toeboards, when used as falling object protection, shall be erectedalong the edge of the overhead walking/working surface for a distance sufficientto protect employees using the point of access below. (2) Toeboards shall be capable of withstanding, without failure, a forceof at least 50 pounds (222 N) applied in any downward or outward directionat any point along the toeboard. (3) Toeboards shall be a minimum of three and one-half inches (8.9 cm)in height measured vertically from their top edge to the level of the walking/workingsurface. They shall have not more than one-half inch (1.3 cm) clearanceabove the walking/working surface. They shall be solid or have openingsnot over one inch (2.5 cm) in greatest dimension. (4) Where tools, equipment, or materials are piled higher than the topedge of a toeboard, paneling or screening shall be erected from the walking/workingsurface or toeboard to the top of a guardrail system's toprail or midrail,for a distance sufficient to protect the employees using the point of accessbelow. (5) Guardrail systems, when used as falling object protection, shall haveall openings small enough to reject passage of potential falling objects.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Subpart M_Guardrail Systems </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The standard requires guardrail systems and components to be designedand built to meet certain requirements including andSection;1915.203 (a)(3),(a)(4), (a)(5), and (d)(2). This appendix serves as a non-mandatory guidelineto assist employers in complying with these requirements. An employer mayuse these guidelines as a starting point for designing guardrail and toeboardsystems. However, the guidelines do not provide all the information necessaryto build a complete system, and the employer is still responsible for designingand assembling these components in such a way that the completed systemwill meet the capacity and strength requirements of the standard. Componentsfor which no specific guidelines are given in this appendix (e.g., joints,base connections, components made with other materials, and componentswith other dimensions) must also be designed and constructed in such away that the completed system meets the capacity and strength requirementsof andSection;1915.203. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) For wood components: Wood components shall be minimum 1,500 lb-ft/in2fiber (stress grade) construction grade lumber; the posts shall be at leasttwo-inch by four-inch lumber spaced not more than eight feet apart on centers;the toprail shall be at least two-inch by four-inch lumber, the intermediaterail shall be at least two-inch by four-inch lumber; the toeboard shallbe at least one-inch by four-inch lumber. All lumber dimensions are nominalsizes as provided by the American Softwood Lumber Standards, dated January1970. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) For pipe railings: posts, toprails, and intermediate railingsshall be at least one and one-half inches nominal diameter with posts spacednot more than eight feet apart on centers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) For structural steel railings: posts, toprails, and intermediaterails shall be at least two-inch by two-inch by three-eighths-inch angles,with posts spaced not more than eight feet apart on centers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-27002 Filed 11-28-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>